Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.818

Public employees' retirement system members who previously declined membership in the teachers' retirement system—Transfer to plan 3—Irrevocable option.

Any member of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 who is employed in an eligible position as an educational staff associate and who elected pursuant to RCW 41.32.032(2)(a) to remain a member of the public employees' retirement system under chapter 41.40 RCW may make an irrevocable option before January 1, 1998, to transfer to plan 3 pursuant to RCW 41.32.817, PROVIDED THAT:

(1) Only service credit for previous periods of employment in a position covered by RCW 41.32.010 is transferred to plan 3;

(2) Equivalent accumulated employee and employer contributions attributable to service covered by subsection (1) of this section are transferred to plan 3;

(3) Employer contributions transferred under this section shall be paid into the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund.

[ 1996 c 39 s 3; 1995 c 239 s 304.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.